Washington statutes.
RCW 36.64.040

Joint courthouse and city hall—Funds, how provided.

The money to be contributed by a county or a city or both may be raised by a sale of its bonds, or by general taxation. Any county or city possessing funds or having funds available for a county courthouse or city hall from the sale of bonds or otherwise, may contract for the expenditure of such funds.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.64.040. Prior: 1913 c 90 s 3; RRS s 3994.]